New Jersey, session 221, A3698.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.   There is appropriated to the State Agriculture Development Committee the sum of $1,723,000 for the purpose of providing grants to qualifying tax exempt nonprofit organizations, as listed in subsection b. of this section, for up to 50 percent of the cost of acquisition of development easements on farmland or for up to 50 percent of the cost of acquisition of fee simple titles to farmland for resale or lease with agricultural deed restrictions approved by the committee, as follows: (1)   $896,678.23 from dedicated corporation business tax revenues pursuant to Article VIII, Section II, paragraph 6 of the State Constitution in the Preserve New Jersey Farmland Preservation Fund, established pursuant to section 8 of the Preserve New Jersey Act, P.L.2016, c.12 (C.13:8C-50), made available due to the reallocation of previously appropriated monies; and (2)   $826,321.77 from the 2009 Farmland Preservation Fund, established pursuant to section 18 of the Green Acres, Water Supply and Floodplain Protection, and Farmland and Historic Preservation Bond Act of 2009, P.L.2009, c.117, made available due to the reallocation of previously appropriated monies. b.    The following projects are eligible for funding with the monies appropriated pursuant to subsection a. of this section: Applicant (Project) Farm County Municipality Amount of Grant Not to Exceed The Land Conservancy of New Jersey Luksza Living Trust Hunterdon Delaware Twp $400,850 Joanne L. Hofstetter Rev. Trust & David A. Hofstetter Rev. Trust Hunterdon Union Twp $190,850 Vosper, Michelle Marie Sussex Stillwater Twp $534,200 Hubbard, Adam Sussex Wantage Twp $210,600 526 Delaware Rd., LLC Warren Blairstown Twp $386,500 2.    The expenditure of the sums appropriated by this act is subject to the provisions and conditions of P.L.2016, c.12 (C.13:8C-43 et seq.), P.L.2009, c.117, P.L.1999, c.152 (C.13:8C-1 et seq.), and P.L.1983, c.32 (C.4:1C-11 et seq.), as appropriate. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.